Hawaii, session 2026, SB883.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The purpose of this Act is to effectuate the
2 title of this Act.
3 SECTION 2. The Hawaii Revised Statutes is amended to
4 conform to the purpose of this Act.
5 SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
6 _____ . _
. /C
INTRODUCED BY:
2025-0892 SB SMA(A).docx
TINAIIIRVVIAAImEMAnnm III MIIIIIII

S.B. NO. 083